Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-703
Delegates to national convention;
selection or election; national party rules; state political party; duty.

In each presidential election year, the total number of delegates and
alternate delegates representing this state at the national conventions of
the political parties and their method of selection or election shall be determined
by the rules of the national political party holding the convention. The Secretary
of State in consultation with the Attorney General shall have the authority
to do all things necessary in the administration of the Election Act, including
ballot preparation, separation of ballots, and ballot instructions, to comply
with and carry out the intent of national political party rules and court
decisions. Whenever the act is in conformity with national political party
rules as to the election of delegates, the election procedures found in the
act shall be followed. The state political party shall furnish a copy of the
national political party rules regarding selection of delegates to the Secretary
of State no later than December 1 of the year preceding each presidential election
year.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 203;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 68;

Laws 2014, LB1048, § 7.